Maine, session 132, LD744.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §1132, sub-§11, as amended by PL 2023, c. 671, §1, is further
amended to read:
11. Working waterfront land. "Working waterfront land" means a parcel of land, or
a portion thereof, that fully or partially abuts water to the head of tide or land located in the
intertidal zone that is used primarily or used predominantly to provide access to or support
the conduct of commercial fishing activities. "Working waterfront land" also includes a
wharf or pier used primarily or used predominantly by persons engaged in commercial
fishing activities that include, including, but not limited to, berthing and storage of a boat
and the location of small fishing houses for commercial fishing gear maintenance and
storage of commercial fishing gear. For purposes of this subchapter, a parcel is deemed to
include a unit of real estate notwithstanding the fact that it is divided by a road, way,
railroad or pipeline.
Page 1 - 132LR0099(03)